Missouri, session 2026, HB3467.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 70.210, 160.910, 162.755, 205.968, 630.140, and 630.407,
RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
70.210, 160.910, 162.755, 205.968, 205.974, 630.140, and 630.407, to read as follows:
70.210. As used in sections 70.210 to 70.320, the following terms mean:
(1) "Governing body", the board, body or persons in which the powers of a
municipality or political subdivision are vested;
(2) "Municipality", municipal corporations, political corporations, and other public
corporations and agencies authorized to exercise governmental functions;
(3) "Political subdivision", counties, townships, cities, towns, villages, school, county
library, city library, city-county library, road, drainage, sewer, levee and fire districts, soil and
water conservation districts, watershed subdistricts, county hospitals, any board of control of
an art museum, any 911 or emergency services board authorized in chapter 190 or section
321.243, the board created under sections 205.968 to [205.973] 205.974, and any other public
subdivision or public corporation having the power to tax.
160.910. 1. The lead agency shall maintain a state Part C early intervention system
under Part C of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Section 1431, et
seq., for eligible children and families of such children which shall be administered through
the regional Part C early intervention system.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3467 2
2. The lead agency shall compile data in the system on the number of eligible children
in the state in need of early intervention services, the number of eligible children and their
families served, the types of services provided, and other information as deemed necessary by
the agency.
3. The state Part C early intervention system shall include a comprehensive child-find
system and public awareness program to ensure that eligible children are identified, located,
referred to the system, and evaluated for eligibility.
4. The lead agency shall monitor system expenditures for administrative services and
regional offices to ensure maximum utilization of state funds for all children determined to be
eligible for early intervention services. The lead agency or its designee shall provide regional
offices with the necessary financial data to assist regional offices in monitoring their
expenditures and the cost of direct services. Such data shall include the number of children
eligible from the most recent child count from that region and monthly data reports on the
costs spent by providers in their network.
5. The lead agency shall establish a bidding process for determining regional offices
across the state. The bidding process shall establish criteria for allowing regions to
implement models that will serve the unique needs of their community. Such process shall
encourage organizations bidding for a center to demonstrate agreements:
(1) With other state and local government entities that provide services to infants and
toddlers with developmental disabilities including regional centers as defined in section
633.005 and boards established under sections 205.968 to [205.973] 205.974; and
(2) To collaborate with established, quality early intervention providers in the region
to establish a network for early intervention services.
6. The lead agency shall establish a centralized system of provider enrollment to
assure that all Part C early intervention system providers meet requirements of Part C
regulations and the Missouri state plan.
7. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23.253 to the contrary, the provisions of
this section shall not sunset.
162.755. 1. The state board of education shall provide reasonable transportation for
children who attend day schools or programs operated by the state board of education or who
attend programs operated through contract by the state board of education as provided in
section 162.735.
2. Sheltered workshops holding a certificate of approval from the department of
elementary and secondary education under section 178.920 and clients of other facilities
operated under the provisions of sections 205.968 to [205.973] 205.974 and Missouri schools
for the severely disabled may cooperate in the provision of employee, client and student
transportation. Employees of sheltered workshops and clients of other facilities operated

HCS HB 3467 3
under the provisions of sections 205.968 to [205.973] 205.974may be transported to sheltered
workshops and other facilities in vehicles owned and operated by the department of
elementary and secondary education or hired by the department for student transportation or
students may be transported in vehicles owned and operated or hired by sheltered workshops
or other facilities operated under the provisions of sections 205.968 to [205.973] 205.974 to
Missouri schools for the severely disabled.
3. The provision of sheltered workshop employee or other client transportation in
vehicles owned and operated or hired by the department of elementary and secondary
education shall not unduly interfere with the routes and schedules of the Missouri schools for
the severely disabled and reasonable compensation may be paid by the sheltered workshop or
other facility for the developmentally disabled to the department of elementary and secondary
education.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education may secure transportation
for students in the Missouri schools for the severely disabled in vehicles owned and operated
or hired by sheltered workshops or other facilities operated under the provisions of sections
205.968 to [205.973] 205.974 and make reasonable compensation for the service to the
sheltered workshop or other facility for the developmentally disabled.
205.968. 1. As set forth in section 205.971 or subsection 4 of section 205.974, when
a levy is approved by the voters, the governing body of any county or city not within a county
of this state shall establish a board of directors. The board of directors shall be a legal entity
empowered to establish and/or operate a sheltered workshop as defined in section 178.900,
residence facilities, or related services, for the care or employment, or both, of persons with a
disability. The facility may operate at one or more locations in the county or city not within a
county. Once established, the board may in its own name engage in and contract for any and
all types of services, actions or endeavors, not contrary to the law, necessary to the successful
and efficient prosecution and continuation of the business and purposes for which it is
created, and may purchase, receive, lease or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, sell,
convey, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of real and personal property, or any
interest therein, or other assets wherever situated and may incur liability and may borrow
money at rates of interest up to the market rate published by the Missouri division of finance.
The board shall be taken and considered as a "political subdivision" as the term is defined in
section 70.600 for the purposes of sections 70.600 to 70.755.
2. Services may only be provided for those persons defined as persons with a
disability in section 178.900 and those persons defined as persons with a disability in this
section whether or not employed at the facility or in the community, and for persons who are
disabled due to developmental disability. Persons having substantial functional limitations
due to a mental illness as defined in section 630.005 shall not be eligible for services under

HCS HB 3467 4
the provisions of sections 205.968 to [205.972] 205.974 except that those persons may
participate in services under the provisions of sections 205.968 to [205.972] 205.974. All
persons otherwise eligible for facilities or services under this section shall be eligible
regardless of their age; except that, individuals employed in sheltered workshops must be at
least sixteen years of age. The board may, in its discretion, impose limitations with respect to
individuals to be served and services to be provided. Such limitations shall be reasonable in
the light of available funds, needs of the persons and community to be served as assessed by
the board, and the appropriateness and efficiency of combining services to persons with
various types of disabilities.
3. For the purposes of sections 205.968 to [205.972] 205.974, the term
(1) "Developmental disability" shall mean either or both paragraph (a) or (b) of this
subsection:
(a) A disability which is attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, autism,
epilepsy, a learning disability related to a brain dysfunction or a similar condition found by
comprehensive evaluation to be closely related to such conditions, or to require habilitation
similar to that required for intellectually disabled persons; and
a. Which originated before age eighteen; and
b. Which can be expected to continue indefinitely;
(b) A developmental disability as defined in section 630.005;
(2) "Person with a disability" shall mean a person who is lower-range educable or
upper-range trainable intellectually disabled or a person who has a developmental disability.
205.974. 1. If the annual revenue collected from the property tax imposed under
sections 205.971 to 205.972 decreases below the amount of revenue generated from such
property tax collected during the 2026 fiscal year, the board established under the
provisions of sections 205.968 to 205.974 may request that the governing body of the
county or city not within a county submit to the qualified voters of such county or city
not within a county a proposition to impose a sales tax in an amount up to one-half of
one percent on all retail sales made in the county or city not within a county in which the
board operates that are subject to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to
144.525 for the purpose of establishing, improving, and maintaining the county or city
not within a county sheltered workshop, residence facility, or related services. The tax
authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by
law and may be imposed in addition to the property tax authorized under sections
205.971 to 205.972, except that no sales tax imposed pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall be effective unless the governing body of the county or city not within a
county submits to the voters of such county or city not within a county, at a municipal or

HCS HB 3467 5
state general, primary, or special election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of
such county or city not within a county to impose a tax under this section.
2. The ballot of submission shall be submitted in substantially the following
form:
Shall ______ (name of county or city not within a county)
impose a sales tax of ______ (insert amount up to one-half of
one percent) for the purpose of establishing, improving,
(and) (or) maintaining a sheltered workshop, (and) (or)
residence facility, (and) (or) related services for people with
developmental disabilities?
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place
an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the proposal, the sales tax authorized in this section shall be in
effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the proposal, the governing body of such county or city not within a county shall not
impose the sales tax authorized in this section unless and until the governing body
resubmits a proposal to the voters to authorize the governing body to impose the sales
tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting thereon.
4. (1) If a county or city not within a county has not established a board and
implemented a property tax as allowed under the provisions of sections 205.968 to
205.974 on or before the effective date of this section, the county or city not within a
county establishing a board after the effective date of this section may choose to submit
to the voters the property tax authorized under sections 205.971 to 205.972 or may
choose to submit the sales tax authorized under this section without first imposing such
property tax.
(2) If such county or city not within a county establishing a board after the
effective date of this section submits the property tax authorized under sections 205.971
to 205.972, is authorized by the voters to impose such property tax, and the annual
revenue collected from the authorized property tax decreases below the amount of
revenue generated from such property tax collected during the first full fiscal year of the
implementation of such tax, such county or city not within a county may submit the
sales tax authorized under this section subject to the other provisions of this section and

HCS HB 3467 6
if approved by the voters, may impose such sales tax in addition to the property tax
imposed for the same purpose in order to supplement.
5. All revenue received by a county or city not within a county from the tax
authorized under this section shall be deposited in a special fund, as other proceeds
collected under the provisions of sections 205.971 and 205.972, and shall be used solely
for the purposes specified in the proposal submitted under this section for so long as the
tax shall remain in effect.
630.140. 1. Information and records compiled, obtained, prepared or maintained by
the residential facility, mental health program operated, funded or licensed by the department
or otherwise, specialized service, or by any mental health facility or mental health program in
which people may be civilly detained pursuant to chapter 632 in the course of providing
services to either voluntary or involuntary patients, residents or clients shall be confidential.
2. The facilities or programs shall disclose information and records including
medication given, dosage levels, and individual ordering such medication to the following
upon their request:
(1) The parent of a minor patient, resident or client;
(2) The guardian or other person having legal custody of the patient, resident or
client;
(3) The attorney of a patient, resident or client who is a ward of the juvenile court, an
alleged incompetent, an incompetent ward or a person detained under chapter 632, as
evidenced by court orders of the attorney's appointment;
(4) An attorney or personal physician as authorized by the patient, resident or client;
(5) Law enforcement officers and agencies, information about patients, residents or
clients committed pursuant to chapter 552, but only to the extent necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of their office, and all such law enforcement officers shall be obligated to
keep such information confidential;
(6) The entity or agency authorized to implement a system to protect and advocate the
rights of persons with developmental disabilities under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Sections
15042 to 15044. The entity or agency shall be able to obtain access to the records of a person
with developmental disabilities who is a client of the entity or agency if such person has
authorized the entity or agency to have such access; and the records of any person with
developmental disabilities who, by reason of mental or physical condition is unable to
authorize the entity or agency to have such access, if such person does not have a legal
guardian, conservator or other legal representative, and a complaint has been received by the
entity or agency with respect to such person or there is probable cause to believe that such
person has been subject to abuse or neglect. The entity or agency obtaining access to a
person's records shall meet all requirements for confidentiality as set out in this section;

HCS HB 3467 7
(7) The entity or agency authorized to implement a system to protect and advocate the
rights of persons with mental illness under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 10801 et seq.,
as amended, shall be able to obtain access to the records of a patient, resident or client who by
reason of mental or physical condition is unable to authorize the system to have such access,
who does not have a legal guardian, conservator or other legal representative and with respect
to whom a complaint has been received by the system or there is probable cause to believe
that such individual has been subject to abuse or neglect. The entity or agency obtaining
access to a person's records shall meet all requirements for confidentiality as set out in this
section. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply to a person who has a significant
mental illness or impairment as determined by a mental health professional qualified under
the laws and regulations of the state; and
(8) To individuals, designated by the department of mental health as community
mental health liaisons, for the purpose of coordination of care and services.
3. The facilities or services may disclose information and records under any of the
following:
(1) As authorized by the patient, resident or client;
(2) To persons or agencies responsible for providing health care services to such
patients, residents or clients as permitted by the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA), as amended;
(3) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim or for a claim to be made
on behalf of a recipient for aid or insurance;
(4) To qualified personnel for the purpose of conducting scientific research,
management audits, financial audits, program evaluations or similar studies; provided, that
such personnel shall not identify, directly or indirectly, any individual patient, resident or
client in any report of such research, audit or evaluation, or otherwise disclose patient,
resident or client identities in any manner;
(5) To the courts as necessary for the administration of chapter 211, 475, 552, or 632;
(6) To law enforcement officers or public health officers, but only to the extent
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office, and all such law enforcement and
public health officers shall be obligated to keep such information confidential;
(7) Pursuant to an order of a court or administrative agency of competent jurisdiction;
(8) To the attorney representing petitioners, but only to the extent necessary to carry
out their duties under chapter 632;
(9) To the department of social services or the department of health and senior
services as necessary to report or have investigated abuse, neglect, or rights violations of
patients, residents, or clients;

HCS HB 3467 8
(10) To a county board established pursuant to sections 205.968 to [205.973]
205.974, but only to the extent necessary to carry out their statutory responsibilities. The
county board shall not identify, directly or indirectly, any individual patient, resident or client;
(11) To parents, legal guardians, treatment professionals, law enforcement officers,
and other individuals who by having such information could mitigate the likelihood of a
suicide. The facility treatment team shall have determined that the consumer's safety is at
some level of risk;
(12) To individuals, designated by the department of mental health as community
mental health liaisons, for the purpose of coordination of care and services.
4. The facility or program shall document the dates, nature, purposes and recipients of
any records disclosed under this section and sections 630.145 and 630.150.
5. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding under chapter 632 shall
be confidential and available only to the patient, the patient's attorney, guardian, or, in the
case of a minor, to a parent or other person having legal custody of the patient, to the
petitioner and the petitioner's attorney, and to the Missouri state highway patrol for reporting
to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS), and to individuals
designated by the department of mental health as community mental health liaisons for the
purpose of coordination of care and services. In addition, the court may order the release or
use of such records or files only upon good cause shown, and the court may impose such
restrictions as the court deems appropriate.
6. Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit the rights of discovery in judicial or
administrative procedures as otherwise provided for by statute or rule.
7. The fact of admission of a voluntary or involuntary patient to a mental health
facility under chapter 632 may only be disclosed as specified in subsections 2 and 3 of this
section.
630.407. 1. The department may recognize providers as administrative entities under
the following circumstances:
(1) Vendors operated or funded pursuant to sections 205.975 to 205.990;
(2) Vendors operated or funded pursuant to sections 205.968 to [205.973] 205.974;
(3) Providers of a consortium of treatment services to the clients of the division of
comprehensive psychiatric services as an agent of the division in a service area, except that
such providers may not exceed thirty-six in number; or
(4) Providers of targeted case management services to the clients of the division of
developmental disabilities as an agent of the division in a defined region that has not
established a board as set forth in sections 205.968 to [205.973] 205.974.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may
contract directly with vendors recognized as administrative entities without competitive bids.

HCS HB 3467 9
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of
administration shall delegate the authority to administrative entities which are state facilities
to subcontract with other vendors in order to provide a full consortium of treatment services
for the service area.
4. When state contracts allow, the department may authorize administrative entities to
use state contracts for pharmaceuticals or other medical supplies for the purchase of these
items.
5. A designation as an administrative entity does not entitle a provider to coverage
under sections 105.711 to 105.726, the state legal expense fund, or other state statutory
protections or requirements.
6. The department shall promulgate regulations within twelve months of August 28,
1990, regulating the manner in which they will contract and designate and revoke
designations of providers under this section. Such regulations shall not be required when the
parties to such contracts are both governmental entities.
✔